Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EXPANDED CORPORATE TAX COMPLIANCE INITIATIVE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue to develop and implement an expanded corporate tax compliance initiative. This funding is available until July 1, 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin For the purposes of subdivision 1, "expanded corporate tax compliance initiative" means a program to enhance tax compliance and enforcement activities under the corporate franchise tax, including the identification and collection of tax liabilities from corporations that currently do not accurately report taxable income, calculate a credit, or otherwise pay all taxes owed. The initiative must prioritize compliance and enforcement activities among corporations reporting $25,000,000 or more in Minnesota sales or gross receipts for a taxable year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Restriction. new text end new text begin Amounts appropriated under this section must supplement and not supplant other amounts available for the purposes described in this section. new text end